West Virginia, session 2026, HB4495.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 40. sober living residences. §8-40-1. Municipalities and sober living residences; authority, requirements. (a) Any sober living or other recovery residence, as defined by §16-59-1 of this code, that is to be placed within the limits of a municipality within this state, must apply for permission from the municipality and receive that permission from the municipality after the recovery residence or sober living facility has received certification under §16-59-2 of this code.(b) A municipality may waive or require the voluntary certification for sober living residences listed in §16-59-2 of this code in determining whether to permit a recovery residence to be established within the municipality's limits.(c) A municipality may require renewals and inspections of sober living facilities as it determines.